Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 19.3 Sentencing Standards

12-19.3-1.
Legislative purpose.

In order that the sentences imposed upon convicted criminals by the courts of this state do justice to the victim, the offender, and the community, a system of sentencing standards is enacted. Those standards are intended to create a sentencing process which will allow for judicial consideration of mitigating and aggravating circumstances unique to the particular defendant and crime, while providing the structure necessary to impose consistent sentences upon similar offenders convicted of like crimes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 412, § 1.

12-19.3-2.
Adoption of presumptive sentences.

Each year the justices of the superior court shall by majority vote, and with the approval of the supreme court, adopt as a rule of court presumptive sentences to be imposed upon defendants who have been found guilty after a trial. The rule shall establish a presumptive sentence or sentencing range for each category of felony which constituted more than five percent (5%) of the criminal caseload in the superior court during the preceding year and for any additional categories of felonies that the justices deem appropriate. It shall also set forth the criteria for evaluation upon which the presumptive sentences are based. Prior to implementation, the rule shall be forwarded to the supreme court for its approval. A complete listing of the presumptive sentences so established shall be made public no less than thirty (30) days prior to implementation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 17.

12-19.3-3.
Procedures for sentencing.

In all cases where the defendant has been found guilty after trial of an offense for which a sentencing standard has been established pursuant to §

12-19.3-2

, the trial justice shall impose a sentence within the presumptive sentencing range unless he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of an alternative sentence. This finding may be based upon the character and background of the defendant, the nature and circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. When justified by those factors, he or she may impose either a more lenient or a more severe sentence than provided for in the rule. If a sentence outside of the presumptive range is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances which he or she found as justification for imposition of the alternative sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 412, § 1.

12-19.3-4.
Review of sentence.

Within twenty (20) days of the imposition of a sentence which is outside the presumptive sentencing range for the offense, the attorney general, if the court imposes a less severe sentence, or the defendant, if the court imposes a more severe sentence, may appeal the sentence to the supreme court in accordance with procedures to be established by the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 412, § 1.